District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-303.07

Cancellation of invitations for bids.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 307, 32 DCR 7396
Oct. 22, 2009, D.C. Law 18-64, § 2(d), 56 DCR 6603
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1183.7.